lt-LT: Poveržlės forma: Disko užraktas; Apvali; Plokščia; Užrakto poveržlė; „Nordlock“; Raudonojo pluošto; Saugos; Dantyta, atspari drebėjimui; Spyruoklinė; Kvadratinė plokštė; Žvaigždinė; Skirtukas; Smailėjanti; Kita
ko: 와셔 형태: 디스크 잠금; 펜더; 플랫; 이붙이 와셔; 노드락; 레드 화이버; 안전; 톱니 모양의 흔들림 방지; 봄; 스퀘어 플레이트; 스타록; 탭; 테이퍼; 기타
es: Forma de la arandela: Bloqueo de disco; Fender; Puro; Arandela de seguridad; Nordlock; Fibra roja; Seguridad; Dentada a prueba de sacudidas; Primavera; Cuadrada plana; Starlock; Pestaña; Cónica; Otros
zh-CN: 垫圈形式: 盘锁; 防护板; 扁平的; 锁紧垫圈; Nordlock; 红色纤维; 安全; 锯齿状防震; 春季; 方形板; Starlock; 贴边; 锥形蜡烛; 其他
it: Forma della rondella: Con blocco automatico; Parafango; Piatto; Rondella di bloccaggio; Nordlock; In fibra rossa; Sicurezza; Seghettata a prova di scossa; Primavera; Piatta quadrato; Starlock; Linguetta; Conicità; Altro
hu: Csavaralátét formája: Lemezzár; Sárvédő; Lapos; Zármosó; Nordlock; Vörös szál; Biztonsági; Fogazott rázásbiztos; Rugó; Négyzet alakú lemez; Starlock; Tab; Kúpos; Egyéb
fr: Forme de rondelle: Verrouillage du disque; Aile; Plate; Rondelle de blocage; Nord-lock; Fibre rouge; De sûreté; Dentelée anti-chocs; Printemps; Plaque carrée; Starlock; Languette; Cône; Autre
tr: Yıkama formu: Disk kilidi; Çamurluk; Düz; Kilit pulu; Nordlock; Kırmızı elyaf; Emniyet; Tırtıklı sarsıntıya dayanıklı; İlkbahar; Kare plaka; Yıldız kilidi; Şerit; Konik; Diğer
cs: Forma podložky: Diskový zámek; Blatníkové; Plochý; Pojistná podložky; Nordlock; Červené vlákno; Bezpečnostní; Vroubkované s odolností proti otřesům; Jaro; Čtvercové; Pojistné Starlock; Zavírání na patent; Kužel; Jiné
sk-SK: Forma podložky: Zámok disku; Fender; Rovný; Zaisťovacia podložka; Nordlock; Červené vlákno; Bezpečnosť; Zúbkovaná ochrana proti otrasom; Pružinový; Štvorcový; Starlock; Tesniaci; Klínový; Iné
pt-BR: Formato da arruela: Trava de disco; Para-choque; Plana; Arruela de pressão; Nordlock; Fibra vermelha; De segurança; Arruela serrilhada; Primavera; Prato quadrado; Starlock; Guia; Cônicas; Outro
ja: ワッシャーの形状: ディスクロック; フェンダー; フラット; ロックワッシャー; ノルトロック; 赤色ファイバー; 安全; 鋸歯状防振; 春; スクエアプレート; スターロック; タブ; テーパー; その他
sl-SI: Oblika podložke: Zaklep diska; Ploščata, mala luknja; Ploščata, velika luknja; Vzmetna, rigidna; Nordlock; Rdeča vlakna; Varnostna; Nazobčana, odporen na tresenje; Vzmetna, fleksibilna; Kvadratna plošča; Zobate; Z jezičkom; Zožena; Drugo
fi: Pesukoneen ulkomuoto: Levylukko; Lokasuoja; Tasainen; Jousilaatta; Nordlock-aluslevy; Punainen kuitu; Turvallisuus; Sahalaitainen tärinänkestävä; kevät; Neliönmuotoinen levy; Tähtilukko; Vedin; Kartiomainen; Muu
pt-PT: Forma de arruela: Bloqueio de disco; Pára-choque; Plano; Anilha de bloqueio; Nordlock; Fibra vermelha; Segurança; Serrilhado à prova de vibração; Primavera; Placa quadrangular; Starlock; Tampa; Para castiçal; Outro
el: Μορφή ροδέλας στεγανοποίησης: Κλείδωμα δίσκου; Φτερό; Επίπεδη; Ροδέλα κλειδαριάς; Nordlock; Κόκκινη ίνα; Ασφάλεια; Οδοντωτό κούνημα απόδειξη; Ελατήριο; Τετράγωνη πλάκα; Starlock; Αυτί; Λαμπάδα; Άλλο
ru: Форма шайбы: Дисковая; Кузовная; Плоская; Стопорная шайба; Nordlock; Красная фибровая; Безопасный; Зубчатая виброустойчивая; Пружинная; Квадратная пластина; Старлок; Вкладка; Конус; Другой
ro-RO: Formă șaibă: Blocare disc; Aripă; Plată; Șaibă de blocare; Nordlock; Fibră roșie; Siguranță; Zimțată cu rezistență la mișcare; Cu arc; Placă pătrată; Starlock; De siguranță cu umeri; Conică; Altele
pl: Forma podkładki: Blokada dysku; Błotnik; Płaski; Podkładka blokująca; Nordlock; Czerwone włókno; Bezpieczeństwo; Ząbkowany, odporny na wstrząsy; Sprężyna; Kwadratowy talerz; Starlock; Uszko; Stożek; Inne
sv: Brickform: Skivlås; Fender; Platt; Låsbricka; Nordlock; Röd fiber; Säkerhet; Skakningsskyddad med räfflade kanter; Vår; Fyrkantig platta; Starlock; Flik; Avsmalnande; Övrigt
hr-HR: Oblik brtvenog prstena: Zaključavanje diska; Zaštitna podloška; Ravni; Podloška za zaključavanje; Nord-Lock; Crveno vlakno; Sigurnosna; Nazubljeni otporan na trešnju; S oprugom; Četvrtasta podloška; Starlock; S jezičkom; Konusna podloška; Ostalo
bg-BG: Форма на шайба: Дисково заключване; Калник; Плоскa; Заключваща шайба; Nordlock; Червени влакна; Безопасност; Назъбена със защита от разклащане; Пружина; Квадратна пластина; Starlock; Осигурителна шайба със зъбци; Конус; Други
en: Washer form: Disc lock; Fender; Flat; Lock washer; Nordlock; Red fiber; Safety; Serrated shake proof; Spring; Square plate; Starlock; Tab; Taper; Other
da: Skiveform: Skivelås; Kofanger; Flad; Låseskive; Nordlock; Rød fiber; Sikkerhed; Tandformet rystesikker; Forår; Firkantet plade; Starlock; Flig; Tilspidsning; Andet
de: Form der Unterlegscheibe: Sperrscheibe; Schutzblech; Flach; Sicherungsscheibe; Nordlock; Rotes Stahlpapier; Sicherheitsrasierer; Gezahnt, rüttelfest; Frühling; Quadratische Platte; Starlock; Lasche; Konisch; Sonstiges
nb: Skiveform: Skivelås; Fender; Flat; Låseskive; Nordlock; Rød fiber; Sikkerhet; Tannet risebestandig; Vår; Firkantet plate; Starlock; Flik; Taper; Annet
vi: Dạng vòng đệm: Khóa đĩa; Đệm chắn; Phẳng; Đệm hãm; Vòng đệm khóa; Sợi màu đỏ; An toàn; Chống rung răng cưa; Mùa xuân; Tấm vuông; Lưỡi nạo Starlock; Mấu; Dây nến; Khác
zh-TW: 墊圈形式: 碟式鎖; 擋泥板; 平坦; 鎖緊墊片; 防鬆脫; 紅纖維; 安全; 鋸齒狀防震; 春天; 方型板; 星形止動鎖; 標籤; 瘦長型柱狀; 其他
nl: Vorm sluitring: Schijfvergrendeling; Spatbord; Vlak; Borgsluitring; Nordlock; Rode vezel; Veiligheid; Getand schokbestendig; Lente; Vierkant bord; Starlock; Tab; Conus; Andere
th: รูปแบบแหวนรอง: กุญแจล็อคดิสเบรค; บังโคลน; ราบ; แหวนล็อค; แหวนล็อคคู่กันคลาย; แหวนไฟเบอร์สีแดง; ความปลอดภัย; แหวนป้องกันการสั่นแบบฟันเลื่อย; ฤดูใบไม้ผลิ; แหวนสี่เหลี่ยม; แหวนที่มีรูวงในรูปแฉกคล้ายดาว; แท็บ; แท่งเรียว; อื่นๆ